Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1007
Boundary fences.

Whenever abandoned railroad right-of-way trails are developed pursuant to the Trail Development Assistance Act, boundary fences shall be constructed and maintained as required for railroads in sections 74-601 to 74-604 unless such construction and maintenance is waived in writing by affected adjoining property owners. Such fences shall be deemed to be manifestly designed to exclude intruders for the purposes of subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-521.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 846, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-1507;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 382.
January 1, 2010